Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20162-1075.03
Certification inspection of Nebraska-grown
nursery stock, defined.

Certification inspection of Nebraska-grown nursery stock
shall mean an inspection performed pursuant to section 2-1095.

Laws 2013, LB68, § 3.